Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-102
State Library; librarian.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall have the charge of the State Library, of which he shall be librarian.

Laws 1871, § 2, p. 52;

R.S.1913, § 3778;

C.S.1922, § 3171;

C.S.1929, § 51-102;

R.S.1943, § 51-102.

For provisions of bond of State Librarian, see section 11-201.